Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1412.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Arizona online instruction; auditor general; cost study; delayed repeal A. The auditor general shall conduct and complete a cost study of Arizona online instruction programs and schools in this state. The auditor general may select a sample of Arizona online instruction programs, schools and courses for this cost study. The state board of education, the state board for charter schools, the department of education and Arizona online instruction programs and schools shall timely cooperate with and provide to the auditor general necessary information in the form and format prescribed by the auditor general. The cost study shall include all of the following: 1. The cost of providing Arizona online instruction to students pursuant to section 15-808, Arizona Revised Statutes, including administration, technology, personnel and curriculum costs for fiscal years 2022-2023, 2023-2024 and 2024-2025. Any costs that are supported by the federal government shall be considered for the purposes of this cost study. The auditor general may rely on self-reported costs by Arizona online instruction programs and schools for the purposes of this paragraph. 2. Recommendations for reporting options for Arizona online instruction programs and schools related to courses offered by online delivery method, monies spent on each type of course delivery method, the number of students served and the number of teachers by course delivery method. 3. The amount of monies that the school finance formula generates for a student who receives Arizona online instruction and the amount of monies spent by the student's school of attendance. 4. Areas in Arizona online instruction in which this state can reduce or eliminate administrative and reporting requirements. 5. Any other information the auditor general deems necessary. B. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2027. Sec. 2. Appropriation; auditor general; cost study; exemption A. The sum of $165,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the office of auditor general for the cost study prescribed by this act. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.